New Jersey, session 221, A2562.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  (1)  The State Treasurer shall develop and implement electronic payment security standards to enhance consumer safety for electronic payment transactions that the State executes through point-of-sale terminals with a credit, debit, or charge card. The State Treasurer shall issue electronic payment security standards no later than the first State business day of the sixth month beginning after the date of enactment of P.L.    , c.   (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  All necessary State government technological upgrades associated with the electronic payment security standards shall be operational no later than the first State business day of the eighteenth month beginning after the date of enactment of P.L.    , c.   (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill).  Department heads shall take all necessary action to ensure compliance with the electronic payment security standards.  This section shall not be construed to preclude State government entities from adapting additional or more effective technological standards for electronic payments. (2)   Until the State Treasurer issues electronic payment security standards pursuant to this section, the minimum acceptable security standard for electronic payments shall be EMV. (3)   No less frequent than biennially, the State Treasurer shall review and re-issue electronic payment security standards to address technological advances and emerging consumer fraud threats. (4)   The State Treasurer is authorized to adopt rules and regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), to effectuate this section. b.  Electronic payment security standards shall apply to all forms of electronic payment transactions that the State executes through point-of-sale terminals with a credit, debit, or charge card, including, but not limited to, contracts the State enters into with providers of electronic access to public benefits and payment terminals to accept electronic payments on behalf of the State. c.     As used in this section: Electronic payment means any transfer of funds that the State executes through a point-of-sale terminal with a credit, debit, or charge card. Electronic Payment Security Standard means the minimum technological specifications for electronic payments to protect consumers and effectuate efficient processing. EMV means Europay, Mastercard, and Visa smart card embedded microprocessor chip-based payment system. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.